Tennessee, session 114, HB0707.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3115(a)(2)(A), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(vii) A majority of the categories of participants in a conference convened by the
student's LEA or public charter school pursuant to this subdivision (a)(2)(A)(vii)
recommends that the student be promoted. An LEA or public charter school shall
convene a conference to determine whether a student who achieved a performance
level rating of "approaching" on the ELA portion of the student's most recent TCAP test
must be promoted to fourth grade or retained in third grade if the student has earned an
overall letter grade of A or B in the student's third grade ELA class, and the student's
parent or guardian has elected for their student not to attend a learning loss bridge camp
for purposes of subdivision (a)(2)(A)(iv). The conference must be attended by the
following categories of participants: the student's parent or guardian, the student's ELA
teacher, and the student's school principal. The recommendation made by a majority of
the categories of participants in the conference determines whether the student must be
promoted to the fourth grade or retained in the third grade; provided, that a student must
not be retained in the third grade more than once. A student who is promoted to the
fourth grade pursuant to this subdivision (a)(2)(A)(vii) must be assigned a tutor to
provide tutoring services to the student for the entirety of the student's fourth-grade year
based on tutoring requirements established by the department.
HB0707
000409
- 1 -

SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000409